Florida, session 2026, SB560.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 26 39.407, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 27 39.407âMedical, psychiatric, and psychological examination 28 and treatment of child; physical, mental, or substance abuse 29 examination of person with or requesting child custody.â 30 (3) 31 (c)âExcept as provided in paragraphs (b) and (e), the 32 department must file a motion seeking the courtâs authorization 33 to initially provide or continue to provide psychotropic 34 medication to a child in its legal custody. The motion must be 35 supported by a written report prepared by the department which 36 describes the efforts made to enable the prescribing physician 37 or psychiatric nurse, as defined in s. 394.455, to obtain 38 express and informed consent for providing the medication to the 39 child and other treatments considered or recommended for the 40 child. In addition, the motion must be supported by the 41 prescribing physicianâs or psychiatric nurseâs signed medical 42 report providing: 43 1.âThe name of the child, the name and range of the dosage 44 of the psychotropic medication, and that there is a need to 45 prescribe psychotropic medication to the child based upon a 46 diagnosed condition for which such medication is being 47 prescribed. 48 2.âA statement indicating that the physician or psychiatric 49 nurse, as defined in s. 394.455, has reviewed all medical 50 information concerning the child which has been provided. 51 3.âA statement indicating that the psychotropic medication, 52 at its prescribed dosage, is appropriate for treating the 53 childâs diagnosed medical condition, as well as the behaviors 54 and symptoms the medication, at its prescribed dosage, is 55 expected to address. 56 4.âAn explanation of the nature and purpose of the 57 treatment; the recognized side effects, risks, and 58 contraindications of the medication; drug-interaction 59 precautions; the possible effects of stopping the medication; 60 and how the treatment will be monitored, followed by a statement 61 indicating that this explanation was provided to the child if 62 age appropriate and to the childâs caregiver. 63 5.âDocumentation addressing whether the psychotropic 64 medication will replace or supplement any other currently 65 prescribed medications or treatments; the length of time the 66 child is expected to be taking the medication; and any 67 additional medical, mental health, behavioral, counseling, or 68 other services that the prescribing physician or psychiatric 69 nurse, as defined in s. 394.455, recommends. 70 71 A new medical report may be required only when there is a change 72 in the dosage or dosage range of the medication, the type of 73 medication prescribed, the manner of administration of the 74 medication, or the prescribing physician or psychiatric nurse. 75 For purposes of this paragraph, prescribing physicians and 76 psychiatric nurses belonging to the same group practice are 77 considered a single prescriber. 78 Section 2.âParagraphs (a) and (e) of subsection (2) of 79 section 409.1451, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraphs 80 (d) and (e) are added to subsection (6) of that section, to 81 read: 82 409.1451âThe Road-to-Independence Program.â 83 (2)âPOSTSECONDARY EDUCATION SERVICES AND SUPPORT.â 84 (a)âA young adult is eligible for services and support 85 under this subsection if he or she: 86 1.âWas living in licensed care on his or her 18th birthday 87 or is currently living in licensed care; or was at least 14 88 years of age and was adopted from foster care or placed with a 89 court-approved dependency guardian after spending at least 6 90 months in licensed care within the 12 months immediately 91 preceding such placement or adoption; 92 2.âSpent at least 6 months in licensed care before reaching 93 his or her 18th birthday; 94 3.âEarned a standard high school diploma pursuant to s. 95 1002.3105(5), s. 1003.4281, or s. 1003.4282, or its equivalent 96 pursuant to s. 1003.435; 97 4.âHas been admitted for enrollment as a full-time student 98 or its equivalent in an eligible postsecondary educational 99 institution as provided in s. 1009.533. For purposes of this 100 section, the term âfull-timeâ means 9 credit hours or the 101 vocational school equivalent. A student may enroll part-time if 102 he or she has a recognized disability or is faced with another 103 challenge or circumstance that would prevent full-time 104 attendance. A student needing to enroll part-time for any reason 105 other than having a recognized disability must get approval from 106 his or her academic advisor; 107 5.âHas reached 18 years of age but is not yet 26 23 years 108 of age; 109 6.âHas applied, with assistance from the young adultâs 110 caregiver and the community-based lead agency, for any other 111 grants and scholarships for which he or she may qualify; 112 7.âSubmitted a Free Application for Federal Student Aid 113 which is complete and error free; and 114 8.âSigned an agreement to allow the department and the 115 community-based care lead agency access to school records. 116 (e)1.âThe department must advertise the availability of the 117 stipend and must provide notification of the criteria and 118 application procedures for the stipend to children and young 119 adults leaving, or who were formerly in, foster care; 120 caregivers; case managers; guidance and family services 121 counselors; principals or other relevant school administrators; 122 and guardians ad litem. 123 2.âIf the award recipient transfers from one eligible 124 institution to another and continues to meet eligibility 125 requirements, the award shall be transferred with the recipient. 126 3.âThe department, or an agency under contract with the 127 department, shall evaluate each Road-to-Independence award for 128 renewal eligibility on an annual basis. In order to be eligible 129 for a renewal award for the subsequent year, the young adult 130 must: 131 a.âBe enrolled for or have completed the number of hours, 132 or the equivalent, to be considered a full-time student under 133 subparagraph (a)4., unless the young adult qualifies for an 134 exception under subparagraph (a)4. 135 b.âMaintain standards of academic progress as defined by 136 the education institution, except that if the young adultâs 137 progress is insufficient to renew the award at any time during 138 the eligibility period, the young adult may continue to be 139 enrolled for additional terms while attempting to restore 140 eligibility as long as progress towards the required level is 141 maintained. 142 c.âNot have exceeded the lifetime limit of 60 months of 143 financial assistance for services and support provided under 144 this subsection. The lifetime limit applies without exception 145 and regardless of whether the award recipient receives the 146 services and support under this subsection in consecutive or 147 nonconsecutive months. 148 4.âFunds may be terminated during the interim between an 149 award and the evaluation for a renewal award if the department, 150 or an agency under contract with the department, determines that 151 the award recipient is no longer enrolled in an educational 152 institution as described in subparagraph (a)4. or is no longer a 153 resident of this state. 154 5.âThe department, or an agency under contract with the 155 department, shall notify a recipient who is terminated and 156 inform the recipient of his or her right to appeal. 157 6.âAn award recipient who does not qualify for a renewal 158 award or who chooses not to renew the award may apply for 159 reinstatement. An application for reinstatement must be made 160 before the young adult reaches 26 23 years of age. In order to 161 be eligible for reinstatement, the young adult must meet the 162 eligibility criteria and the criteria for award renewal for the 163 program. 164 7.âThe department, or an agency under contract with the 165 department, shall work with the young adult to create a 166 financial plan that is guided by the young adultâs financial 167 goals in meeting his or her needs while in postsecondary 168 education. The financial plan must be included in the transition 169 plan required under s. 39.6035. The department, or an agency 170 under contract with the department, shall review and, if 171 necessary, update the financial plan with the young adult every 172 6 months until funding under this subsection is no longer 173 provided. 174 8.âThe department, or an agency under contract with the 175 department, shall review with the young adult the transition 176 plan required under s. 39.6035 during the year before the young 177 adult graduates from postsecondary education or the year before 178 the young adult reaches 26 23 years of age, whichever occurs 179 first. The transition plan must include an assessment of the 180 young adultâs current and future needs and challenges for self 181 sufficiency and address, at a minimum, how the young adult will 182 meet his or her financial needs and obligations when funding 183 under this subsection is no longer provided. 184 (6)âACCOUNTABILITY.âThe department shall develop outcome 185 measures for the program and other performance measures in order 186 to maintain oversight of the program. No later than January 31 187 of each year, the department shall prepare a report on the 188 outcome measures and the departmentâs oversight activities and 189 submit the report to the President of the Senate, the Speaker of 190 the House of Representatives, and the committees with 191 jurisdiction over issues relating to children and families in 192 the Senate and the House of Representatives. The report must 193 include: 194 (d)âSpecific metrics for postsecondary education services 195 and support provided under subsection (2). Such metrics must be 196 aggregated on a statewide basis and disaggregated by community 197 based care lead agency, age, race, and postsecondary educational 198 institution type as provided in s. 1009.533. Such metrics must 199 include, but are not limited to, the following information for 200 the preceding state fiscal year: 201 1.âThe total number of young adults eligible for services 202 and support under subsection (2). 203 2.âThe total number of applicants and the total number of 204 applicants approved for financial assistance under subsection 205 (2). 206 3.âThe rate of housing instability or homelessness 207 experienced by award recipients during their enrollment period. 208 4.âThe percentage of award recipients described in 209 subparagraph 3. who also received financial assistance under 210 subsection (3) and the average amount of such assistance. 211 5.âThe primary reason for an award recipientâs termination, 212 discontinuation, or nonrenewal under the program, including, but 213 not limited to, academic deficiency, voluntary withdrawal, 214 reaching the age limit, or reaching the lifetime limit. 215 6.âThe educational achievements of award recipients, 216 including, but not limited to: 217 a.âThe postsecondary student retention rate, expressed as a 218 percentage of award recipients who remain continuously enrolled 219 or reenroll for the subsequent academic term. 220 b.âThe postsecondary degree, certificate, or vocational 221 program completion rate. 222 c.âThe average time in which award recipients complete 223 their program of study. 224 d.âThe average unweighted grade point average of award 225 recipients, aggregated on a statewide basis and disaggregated 226 only by postsecondary educational institution type as provided 227 in s. 1009.533. 228 e.âThe percentage of award recipients who graduated from a 229 postsecondary educational institution. 230 (e)âSpecific metrics for aftercare services provided under 231 subsection (3). Such metrics must be aggregated on a statewide 232 basis and disaggregated by community-based care lead agency, 233 age, race, and postsecondary educational institution type as 234 provided in s. 1009.533. Such metrics must include, but are not 235 limited to, the following information for the preceding state 236 fiscal year: 237 1.âThe total number of young adults eligible for the 238 aftercare services under subsection (3). 239 2.âThe total number of young adults who received aftercare 240 services. 241 3.âThe average duration of a young adultâs participation in 242 the program. 243 4.âThe primary reason that a young adult seeks aftercare 244 services. 245 5.âThe total number of financial assistance disbursements 246 made under subparagraph (3)(b)7. for necessities or under 247 subparagraph (3)(b)8. for emergency situations. 248 6.âThe utilization rate of key aftercare components, 249 including, but not limited to, the percentage of participants 250 who: 251 a.âReceive mentoring or tutoring services. 252 b.âReceive mental health or substance abuse counseling 253 referrals. 254 c.âComplete a life skill class, which may include, but is 255 not limited to, a financial literacy or credit management class. 256 d.âReceive job or career skills training. 257 e.âReport housing stability within 90 days after receiving 258 housing-related assistance, which may include, but is not 259 limited to, security deposits for rent and utilities. 260 f.âEnroll in educational or vocational programs, including, 261 but not limited to, the postsecondary education services and 262 support provided under subsection (2), while receiving at least 263 one aftercare service disbursement. 264 Section 3.âParagraphs (j) and (k) of subsection (2) of 265 section 409.175, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 266 409.175âLicensure of family foster homes, residential 267 child-caring agencies, and child-placing agencies; public 268 records exemption.â 269 (2)âAs used in this section, the term: 270 (j)ââPersonnelâ means all owners, operators, employees, and 271 volunteers working in a child-placing agency or residential 272 child-caring agency who may be employed by or do volunteer work 273 for a person, corporation, or agency that holds a license as a 274 child-placing agency or a residential child-caring agency, but 275 the term does not include those who do not work on the premises 276 where child care is furnished and have no direct contact with a 277 child or have no contact with a child outside of the presence of 278 the childâs parent or guardian. For purposes of screening, the 279 term includes any member, over the age of 12 years, of the 280 family of the owner or operator or any person other than a 281 client, a child who is found to be dependent as defined in s. 282 39.01, or a child as defined in s. 39.6251(1), over the age of 283 12 years, residing with the owner or operator if the agency is 284 located in or adjacent to the home of the owner or operator or 285 if the family member of, or person residing with, the owner or 286 operator has any direct contact with the children. Members of 287 the family of the owner or operator, or persons residing with 288 the owner or operator, who are between the ages of 12 years and 289 18 years are not required to be fingerprinted, but must be 290 screened for delinquency records. For purposes of screening, the 291 term also includes owners, operators, employees, and volunteers 292 working in summer day camps, or summer 24-hour camps providing 293 care for children. A volunteer who assists on an intermittent 294 basis for less than 10 hours per month shall not be included in 295 the term âpersonnelâ for the purposes of screening if a person 296 who meets the screening requirement of this section is always 297 present and has the volunteer in his or her line of sight. 298 (k)ââPlacement screeningâ means the act of assessing the 299 background of household members in the family foster home and 300 includes, but is not limited to, criminal history records checks 301 as provided in s. 39.0138 using the standards for screening set 302 forth in that section. The term âhousehold memberâ means a 303 member of the family or a person, other than the child being 304 placed, a child who is found to be dependent as defined in s. 305 39.01, or a child as defined in s. 39.6251(1), over the age of 306 12 years who resides with the owner who operates the family 307 foster home if such family member or person has any direct 308 contact with the child. Household members who are between the 309 ages of 12 and 18 years are not required to be fingerprinted but 310 must be screened for delinquency records. 311 Section 4.âSubsection (13) of section 409.912, Florida 312 Statutes, is amended to read: 313 409.912âCost-effective purchasing of health care.âThe 314 agency shall purchase goods and services for Medicaid recipients 315 in the most cost-effective manner consistent with the delivery 316 of quality medical care. To ensure that medical services are 317 effectively utilized, the agency may, in any case, require a 318 confirmation or second physicianâs opinion of the correct 319 diagnosis for purposes of authorizing future services under the 320 Medicaid program. This section does not restrict access to 321 emergency services or poststabilization care services as defined 322 in 42 C.F.R. s. 438.114. Such confirmation or second opinion 323 shall be rendered in a manner approved by the agency. The agency 324 shall maximize the use of prepaid per capita and prepaid 325 aggregate fixed-sum basis services when appropriate and other 326 alternative service delivery and reimbursement methodologies, 327 including competitive bidding pursuant to s. 287.057, designed 328 to facilitate the cost-effective purchase of a case-managed 329 continuum of care. The agency shall also require providers to 330 minimize the exposure of recipients to the need for acute 331 inpatient, custodial, and other institutional care and the 332 inappropriate or unnecessary use of high-cost services. The 333 agency shall contract with a vendor to monitor and evaluate the 334 clinical practice patterns of providers in order to identify 335 trends that are outside the normal practice patterns of a 336 providerâs professional peers or the national guidelines of a 337 providerâs professional association. The vendor must be able to 338 provide information and counseling to a provider whose practice 339 patterns are outside the norms, in consultation with the agency, 340 to improve patient care and reduce inappropriate utilization. 341 The agency may mandate prior authorization, drug therapy 342 management, or disease management participation for certain 343 populations of Medicaid beneficiaries, certain drug classes, or 344 particular drugs to prevent fraud, abuse, overuse, and possible 345 dangerous drug interactions. The Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics 346 Committee shall make recommendations to the agency on drugs for 347 which prior authorization is required. The agency shall inform 348 the Pharmaceutical and Therapeutics Committee of its decisions 349 regarding drugs subject to prior authorization. The agency is 350 authorized to limit the entities it contracts with or enrolls as 351 Medicaid providers by developing a provider network through 352 provider credentialing. The agency may competitively bid single 353 source-provider contracts if procurement of goods or services 354 results in demonstrated cost savings to the state without 355 limiting access to care. The agency may limit its network based 356 on the assessment of beneficiary access to care, provider 357 availability, provider quality standards, time and distance 358 standards for access to care, the cultural competence of the 359 provider network, demographic characteristics of Medicaid 360 beneficiaries, practice and provider-to-beneficiary standards, 361 appointment wait times, beneficiary use of services, provider 362 turnover, provider profiling, provider licensure history, 363 previous program integrity investigations and findings, peer 364 review, provider Medicaid policy and billing compliance records, 365 clinical and medical record audits, and other factors. Providers 366 are not entitled to enrollment in the Medicaid provider network. 367 The agency shall determine instances in which allowing Medicaid 368 beneficiaries to purchase durable medical equipment and other 369 goods is less expensive to the Medicaid program than long-term 370 rental of the equipment or goods. The agency may establish rules 371 to facilitate purchases in lieu of long-term rentals in order to 372 protect against fraud and abuse in the Medicaid program as 373 defined in s. 409.913. The agency may seek federal waivers 374 necessary to administer these policies. 375 (13)âThe agency may not pay for psychotropic medication 376 prescribed for a child in the Medicaid program without the 377 express and informed consent of the childâs parent or legal 378 guardian. The physician shall document the consent in the 379 childâs medical record and provide a copy of such documentation 380 to the pharmacy with a signed attestation of this documentation 381 with the prescription. The express and informed consent or court 382 authorization for a prescription of psychotropic medication for 383 a child in the custody of the Department of Children and 384 Families shall be obtained pursuant to s. 39.407. 385 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.